Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-434
Reorganization of school districts; methods.

Reorganization of school districts may be accomplished through or by means of any one or more of the following methods: (1) The creation of new districts; (2) the uniting of one or more established districts; (3) the subdivision of one or more established districts; (4) the transfer and attachment to an established district of a part of the territory of one or more districts; and (5) the dissolution or disorganization of an established district for any of the reasons specified by law.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 2, p. 674;

Laws 1990, LB 259, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 22;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 183;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 25;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 19.

Former section 79-801.02 is limited to provisions of former section 79-801, and is not applicable to school district boundary changes under other statutes. Corcoran v. Boone County Board of Equalization, 196 Neb. 363, 243 N.W.2d 60 (1976).

Uniting of one or more districts can be accomplished by reorganization method. School District No. 42 of Hitchcock County v. Marshall, 160 Neb. 832, 71 N.W.2d 549 (1955).

Reorganization of School Districts Act provides reasonable limitations and standards. Nickel v. School Board of Axtell, 157 Neb. 813, 61 N.W.2d 566 (1953).

Merger of school districts was subject to election. Peterson v. Hancock, 155 Neb. 801, 54 N.W.2d 85 (1952).